Idaho, session 2026, S1386.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Commission of Pardons and Parole the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $87,100 $87,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $134,400 134,400
TOTAL $87,100 $134,400 $221,500
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation to the Commission of Pardons and Parole is hereby reduced
by $87,100 for operating expenditures from the General Fund for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 97, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Commission of Pardons and Parole the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $43,600 $43,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 $43,600 43,600
TOTAL $43,600 $43,600 $87,200
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Commission of Pardons and Parole in Section 1,
Chapter 97, Laws of 2025, from the General Fund, is hereby reduced by $43,600
for operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 3 and 4 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall
be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.